Washington statutes.
RCW 43.117.140

Lunar new year.

(1) The lunar new year of each year is designated as a time for people of this state to celebrate Asian American culture and to commemorate the contributions of Asian Americans to the history and heritage of Washington state.

(2) The legislature encourages state governmental entities, local governments, schools and institutions of higher education, and cultural organizations to celebrate the lunar new year.

(3) The commission shall create lunar new year programming and resources that these entities may use in planning and structuring their celebrations.

(4) For purposes of this section, "the lunar new year" is the date corresponding with the second new moon following the winter solstice, or the third new moon following the winter solstice should an intercalary month intervene.

[ 2024 c 76 s 2.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2024 c 76: "The legislature finds that each year the people of the great state of Washington unite to celebrate the Lunar New Year, joining to distinguish Asian American joy, cultures, and beautiful diversity. The legislature further acknowledges both the wonderful heritage and collective trauma of our Asian American ancestors, and it deeply appreciates the Asian American community that has made Washington a vibrant place for us all to call home, building and supporting their communities despite the uncertainty they have faced at times. The legislature highlights the solidarity and strength of the Asian American community in the face of violent racism, during the past few years, well before, and ongoing. The legislature intends the Lunar New Year to serve as a time to embrace reflections and understanding as we look towards renewal." [ 2024 c 76 s 1.]